Arkansas, session 2025, HB1933.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-13-611(a), concerning vacancies on a
school district board of directors, is amended add an additional subdivision
to read as follows:
(9) Is subject to a recall petition that is approved by a
majority vote of the electors qualified to vote for the office held by the
member to be removed.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 13, Subchapter 6, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-13-637. Recall election and petition for removal — School district
boards of directors.
(a) A member of a school district board of directors is subject to
recall and removal by a majority vote of the electors qualified to vote for
*SSS291*
04-09-2025 11:30:30 SSS291

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1933
the office held by the member to be removed.
(b) A member of a school district board of directors is subject to
recall and removal for the following reasons, including without limitation:
(1) A moral failing leading to pending criminal charges; and
(2) The loss of public trust.
(c)(1) The petition for removal shall:
(A) State the name of the member of the school district
board of directors to be removed;
(B) Identify the office held by the member of the school
district board of directors who is to be removed;
(C) State that the petition is to hold a recall election
for removal of the member of the school district board of directors from his
or her office; and
(D) State the reason for which removal is sought with an
affidavit signed by the petitioner affirming the truthfulness of that
statement.
(2) A signer on the petition for removal shall:
(A) Sign his or her legal name; and
(B) List his or her residential address.
(3) If a petition for removal signed by at least thirty-five
percent (35%) of the electors who are qualified to vote for the office held
by the member who is to be removed is filed with the county clerk, the county
clerk shall:
(A) Verify the signatures on the petition for removal
within ten (10) days of its filing;
(B) Certify the petition that has been verified to have
the requisite number of valid signatures under this section promptly after
verification; and
(C) Promptly notify the school district board of directors
and the county board of election commissioners of the certification of the
petition.
(4) The petitioner shall have an additional ten (10) days to
circulate the petition for removal if:
(A) At the time the petition for removal is filed, the
petition contains a number of signatures equal to at least thirty-five
percent (35%) of the electors who are eligible to vote for the office held by
04-09-2025 11:30:30 SSS291

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1933
the member to be removed; and
(B) The number of signatures that are verified by the
county clerk as valid under this section is less than thirty-five percent
(35%) of the electors who are eligible to vote for the office held by the
member to be removed.
(d)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, a
recall election under this section shall be held at the next school board
election.
(2) If the next school board election is less than sixty (60)
days after the petition is certified by the county clerk, the recall election
shall be held at the next school board election following the next school
board election.
(3) Except as provided under this section, the recall election
shall be held in accordance with the laws governing the school board
election.
(e)(1) If a person is removed from his or her office under this
section, there is a vacancy in office.
(2) When a vacancy is created under this section the vacancy
shall be filled under the procedure in § 6-13-611.
(3) A vacancy in office shall not be filled by an appointee who
has been removed from the school district board of directors under this
section.
(f) A member of a school district board of directors may be subject to
no more than (1) recall petition during the member's elected term in office.

/s/McCollum










04-09-2025 11:30:30 SSS291